Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-101.02
Farm wineries; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the production, use in manufacturing, and consumption of agricultural products grown within the state by providing for the existence of farm winery operations. The Legislature recognizes that the creation of farm wineries will stimulate the creation of jobs and investments in small communities, encourage the use of lands upon which grapes and other wine-related crops may be grown, and provide tax revenue which would not otherwise be realized.

Laws 1985, LB 279, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 536, § 1.